New Jersey, session 222, A2952.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    A student enrolled in a public institution of higher education which requires the fulfillment of certain classes in health, family life education or sexual education and does not authorize substitutions for those classes, may present to that institution or to the appropriate school official a signed statement that any part of the instruction in those classes is in conflict with the student's conscience or sincerely held moral or religious beliefs and shall be excused from that portion of the class where such instruction is being given and no penalties as to credit or graduation shall result therefrom. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately. STATEMENT A student enrolled in a public institution of higher education may be obligated to fulfill certain class requirements in health, family life education or sexual education which are in conflict with the student's conscience or sincerely held moral or religious beliefs.  This bill excuses a student of a public institution of higher education which requires the fulfillment of those classes, and which does not authorize substitutions for those classes, by allowing the student to present a signed statement to the proper school officials.  Moreover, no penalties as to credit or graduation will result for a student who is legitimately excused from instruction that is in conflict with the student's conscience.  The provisions of this bill mirror law currently in place (18A:35-4.7) regarding students enrolled in public elementary and secondary schools.